Hawaii statutes.
[§173A-7] Administration and management.
The board shall, subject to chapter 171, administer, maintain, and manage any
land acquired under the provisions of this chapter, may charge such fees for
the use of any such land as it considers to be reasonable, and may construct on
such land any improvement which it deems to be necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter. The board may adopt and from time to time amend
regulations implementing the provisions of this chapter. [L 1973, c 77, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next